District of Columbia statutes.
3-3615

Repealed

Application of chapter; service of process.

Repealed.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 630, Pub. L. 88-503, § 15
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-133, § 2(f), 27 DCR 4417
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(a)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 5(d), 45 DCR 745
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837
1981 Ed., § 2-2615.
1973 Ed., § 2-2414.